sl-SI: Večglasnost: Enoglasno; Več tembral; Večglasno; Drugo
de: Polyfonie: Monofon; Multitimbral; Polyfon; Sonstiges
en: Polyphony: Monophonic; Multi-timbral; Polyphonic; Other
vi: Tính đa âm: Đơn âm; Đa âm sắc; Đa âm; Khác
nb: Polyfoni: Monofonisk; Multi-timbral; Polyfonisk; Annet
ja: ポリフォニー: モノフォニック; マルチティンバー; ポリフォニック; その他
sv: Polyfoni: Monofonisk; Multitimbral; Polyfon; Övrigt
cs: Polyfonie: Monofonní; Multitimbrální; Polyfonní; Jiné
ko: 폴리포니: 단음악; 멀티팀브럴; 다성음악; 기타
th: การมีหลายเสียง: ระบบโมโนโฟนิค; ระบบมัลติทิมบรัล; ระบบโพลีโฟนิก; อื่นๆ
fi: Polyfonia: Monofoninen; Moniääninen; Polyfoninen; Muu
ro-RO: Polifonie: Monofonic; Multi-timbral; Polifonic; Altele
hu: Polifónia: Monofonikus; Több hangszín; Polifonikus; Egyéb
es: Polifonía: Monofónico; Multitímbrico; Polifónico; Otros
hr-HR: Polifonija: Monofona; Multitimbralna; Polifona; Ostalo
tr: Çok Seslilik: Monofonik; Çok sesli; Polifonik; Diğer
bg-BG: Полифония: Монофоничен; Мултитимбрален; Полифоничен; Други
fr: Polyphonie: Monophonique; Multitimbral; Polyphonique; Autre
nl: Polyfonie: Monofoon; Multi-timbraal; Polyfoon; Andere
pt-BR: Polifonia: Monofônico; Multitimbral; Polifônico; Outro
zh-TW: 複調音樂: 單聲道; 多音色; 和弦; 其他
ru: Полифония: Монофонический; Мультитембральный; Полифонический; Другой
zh-CN: 复调音乐: 单声部; 多音色; 复调; 其他
it: Polifonia: Monofonico; Multitimbrico; Polifonico; Altro
pl: Polifonia: Monofoniczny; Wielotimbralny; Polifoniczny; Inne
lt-LT: Polifonija: Monofoninis; Daugiabalsis; Polifoninis; Kita
pt-PT: Polifonia: Monofónico; Com vários timbres; Polifónico; Outro
el: Πολυφωνία: Μονοφωνικό; Πολυ-ηχοχρωματικό; Πολυφωνικό; Άλλο
sk-SK: Polyfónia: Monofónny; Multitimbrálny; Polyfónny; Iné
da: Polyfoni: Monofonisk; Multi-timbral; Polyfonisk; Andet